SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0157 Y 11
SFX 0157 i ach .
SFX 0157 i aj .
SFX 0157 i am .
SFX 0157 i ami .
SFX 0157 i ej .
SFX 0157 i ija .
SFX 0157 i o .
SFX 0157 i om .
SFX 0157 i omaj .
SFX 0157 i ow .
SFX 0157 i źe .

SFX 0158 Y 8
SFX 0158 ra rach ..
SFX 0158 ra ram ..
SFX 0158 ra rami ..
SFX 0158 ra romaj ..
SFX 0158 ra row ..
SFX 0158 ra ru ..
SFX 0158 ra ry ..
SFX 0158 ra ře ..

SFX 0159 Y 13
SFX 0159 ł le .
SFX 0159 ł ła .
SFX 0159 ł łach .
SFX 0159 ł łaj .
SFX 0159 ł łam .
SFX 0159 ł łami .
SFX 0159 ł łej .
SFX 0159 ł ło .
SFX 0159 ł łom .
SFX 0159 ł łomaj .
SFX 0159 ł łow .
SFX 0159 ł łu .
SFX 0159 ł ły .

SFX 0160 Y 13
SFX 0160 t ta .
SFX 0160 t tach .
SFX 0160 t taj .
SFX 0160 t tam .
SFX 0160 t tami .
SFX 0160 t te .
SFX 0160 t tej .
SFX 0160 t ti .
SFX 0160 t to .
SFX 0160 t tom .
SFX 0160 t tomaj .
SFX 0160 t tow .
SFX 0160 t će .

SFX 0161 Y 13
SFX 0161 t tach .
SFX 0161 t taj .
SFX 0161 t tam .
SFX 0161 t tami .
SFX 0161 t te .
SFX 0161 t tea .
SFX 0161 t tej .
SFX 0161 t ti .
SFX 0161 t to .
SFX 0161 t tom .
SFX 0161 t tomaj .
SFX 0161 t tow .
SFX 0161 t će .

SFX 0162 Y 14
SFX 0162 a e .
SFX 0162 a eho .
SFX 0162 a ej .
SFX 0162 a eje .
SFX 0162 a eju .
SFX 0162 a emu .
SFX 0162 a i .
SFX 0162 a ich .
SFX 0162 a im .
SFX 0162 a imaj .
SFX 0162 a imi .
SFX 0162 a iši .
SFX 0162 a išo .
SFX 0162 a u .

SFX 0163 Y 11
SFX 0163 a ach .
SFX 0163 a aj .
SFX 0163 a am .
SFX 0163 a ami .
SFX 0163 a e .
SFX 0163 a ej .
SFX 0163 a je .
SFX 0163 a o .
SFX 0163 a om .
SFX 0163 a omaj .
SFX 0163 a ow .

SFX 0164 Y 11
SFX 0164 e ach .
SFX 0164 e aj .
SFX 0164 e am .
SFX 0164 e ami .
SFX 0164 e ea .
SFX 0164 e ej .
SFX 0164 e je .
SFX 0164 e o .
SFX 0164 e om .
SFX 0164 e omaj .
SFX 0164 e ow .

SFX 0165 Y 9
SFX 0165 a ach .
SFX 0165 a aj .
SFX 0165 a am .
SFX 0165 a ami .
SFX 0165 a je .
SFX 0165 a omaj .
SFX 0165 a ow .
SFX 0165 a u .
SFX 0165 a y .

SFX 0166 Y 14
SFX 0166 0 a .
SFX 0166 0 ach .
SFX 0166 0 aj .
SFX 0166 0 am .
SFX 0166 0 ami .
SFX 0166 0 ej .
SFX 0166 0 je .
SFX 0166 0 o .
SFX 0166 0 om .
SFX 0166 0 omaj .
SFX 0166 0 ow .
SFX 0166 0 u .
SFX 0166 0 wa .
SFX 0166 0 y .

SFX 0167 Y 13
SFX 0167 0 a .
SFX 0167 0 ach .
SFX 0167 0 aj .
SFX 0167 0 am .
SFX 0167 0 ami .
SFX 0167 0 ej .
SFX 0167 0 i .
SFX 0167 0 je .
SFX 0167 0 o .
SFX 0167 0 om .
SFX 0167 0 omaj .
SFX 0167 0 ow .
SFX 0167 0 u .

SFX 0168 Y 13
SFX 0168 0 a .
SFX 0168 0 ach .
SFX 0168 0 aj .
SFX 0168 0 am .
SFX 0168 0 ami .
SFX 0168 0 ej .
SFX 0168 0 o .
SFX 0168 0 om .
SFX 0168 0 omaj .
SFX 0168 0 ow .
SFX 0168 0 sy .
SFX 0168 0 u .
SFX 0168 0 y .

SFX 0169 Y 9
SFX 0169 0 ach .
SFX 0169 0 am .
SFX 0169 0 ami .
SFX 0169 0 e .
SFX 0169 0 i .
SFX 0169 0 omaj .
SFX 0169 0 ow .
SFX 0169 0 u .
SFX 0169 0 y .

SFX 0170 Y 11
SFX 0170 i ach .
SFX 0170 i aj .
SFX 0170 i am .
SFX 0170 i ami .
SFX 0170 i ej .
SFX 0170 i je .
SFX 0170 i o .
SFX 0170 i om .
SFX 0170 i omaj .
SFX 0170 i ow .
SFX 0170 i owa .

SFX 0171 Y 10
SFX 0171 a ach .
SFX 0171 a am .
SFX 0171 a ami .
SFX 0171 a i .
SFX 0171 a o .
SFX 0171 a om .
SFX 0171 a omaj .
SFX 0171 a ow .
SFX 0171 a u .
SFX 0171 a źe .

SFX 0172 Y 11
SFX 0172 a ach .
SFX 0172 a aj .
SFX 0172 a am .
SFX 0172 a ami .
SFX 0172 a ej .
SFX 0172 a i .
SFX 0172 a o .
SFX 0172 a om .
SFX 0172 a omaj .
SFX 0172 a ow .
SFX 0172 a źe .

SFX 0173 Y 8
SFX 0173 i ach .
SFX 0173 i am .
SFX 0173 i ami .
SFX 0173 i ije .
SFX 0173 i je .
SFX 0173 i omaj .
SFX 0173 i ow .
SFX 0173 i u .

SFX 0174 Y 14
SFX 0174 0 a .
SFX 0174 0 ach .
SFX 0174 0 aj .
SFX 0174 0 am .
SFX 0174 0 ami .
SFX 0174 0 ej .
SFX 0174 0 je .
SFX 0174 0 jo .
SFX 0174 0 o .
SFX 0174 0 ojo .
SFX 0174 0 om .
SFX 0174 0 omaj .
SFX 0174 0 ow .
SFX 0174 0 u .

SFX 0175 Y 17
SFX 0175 a aj .
SFX 0175 a e .
SFX 0175 a eho .
SFX 0175 a ej .
SFX 0175 a eje .
SFX 0175 a eju .
SFX 0175 a emu .
SFX 0175 a i .
SFX 0175 a je .
SFX 0175 a oh .
SFX 0175 a om .
SFX 0175 a u .
SFX 0175 a y .
SFX 0175 a ych .
SFX 0175 a ym .
SFX 0175 a ymaj .
SFX 0175 a ymi .

SFX 0176 Y 19
SFX 0176 le li ..
SFX 0176 le liši ..
SFX 0176 le lišo ..
SFX 0176 le ła ..
SFX 0176 le łaj ..
SFX 0176 le łe ..
SFX 0176 le łeho ..
SFX 0176 le łej ..
SFX 0176 le łeje ..
SFX 0176 le łeju ..
SFX 0176 le łemu ..
SFX 0176 le łoh ..
SFX 0176 le łom ..
SFX 0176 le łu ..
SFX 0176 le ły ..
SFX 0176 le łych ..
SFX 0176 le łym ..
SFX 0176 le łymaj ..
SFX 0176 le łymi ..

SFX 0177 Y 8
SFX 0177 ej wi ..
SFX 0177 ej wjach ..
SFX 0177 ej wjam ..
SFX 0177 ej wje ..
SFX 0177 ej wjemi ..
SFX 0177 ej wjomaj ..
SFX 0177 ej wjow ..
SFX 0177 ej wju ..

SFX 0178 Y 4
SFX 0178 0 ach .
SFX 0178 0 am .
SFX 0178 0 ami .
SFX 0178 0 i .

SFX 0179 Y 10
SFX 0179 o ach .
SFX 0179 o aj .
SFX 0179 o am .
SFX 0179 o ami .
SFX 0179 o ej .
SFX 0179 o je .
SFX 0179 o oho .
SFX 0179 o om .
SFX 0179 o omaj .
SFX 0179 o ow .

SFX 0180 Y 19
SFX 0180 le li ..
SFX 0180 le lši ..
SFX 0180 le lšo ..
SFX 0180 le ła ..
SFX 0180 le łaj ..
SFX 0180 le łe ..
SFX 0180 le łeho ..
SFX 0180 le łej ..
SFX 0180 le łeje ..
SFX 0180 le łeju ..
SFX 0180 le łemu ..
SFX 0180 le łoh ..
SFX 0180 le łom ..
SFX 0180 le łu ..
SFX 0180 le ły ..
SFX 0180 le łych ..
SFX 0180 le łym ..
SFX 0180 le łymaj ..
SFX 0180 le łymi ..

SFX 0181 Y 12
SFX 0181 óh oha ..
SFX 0181 óh ohach ..
SFX 0181 óh ohaj ..
SFX 0181 óh oham ..
SFX 0181 óh ohami ..
SFX 0181 óh ohej ..
SFX 0181 óh oho ..
SFX 0181 óh ohom ..
SFX 0181 óh ohomaj ..
SFX 0181 óh ohow ..
SFX 0181 óh ohu ..
SFX 0181 óh oze ..

SFX 0182 Y 12
SFX 0182 0 a .
SFX 0182 0 a-~a .
SFX 0182 0 ach .
SFX 0182 0 aj .
SFX 0182 0 am .
SFX 0182 0 ami .
SFX 0182 0 ej .
SFX 0182 0 o .
SFX 0182 0 om .
SFX 0182 0 omaj .
SFX 0182 0 ow .
SFX 0182 0 u .

SFX 0183 Y 10
SFX 0183 a ach .
SFX 0183 a am .
SFX 0183 a e .
SFX 0183 a ej .
SFX 0183 a emi .
SFX 0183 a i .
SFX 0183 a ojo .
SFX 0183 a omaj .
SFX 0183 a ow .
SFX 0183 a u .

SFX 0184 Y 28
SFX 0184 ehń ahnje ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjechmoj ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjechmy ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjechu ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjemoj ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjemy ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjetaj ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjetej ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnjeće ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnještaj ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnještej ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnješće ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnu ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnyli ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnyć ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnył ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnyła ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnyło ...
SFX 0184 ehń ahnyłoj ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehnjacy ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehnjech ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehnjenje ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehnjeny ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehnješ ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehnješe ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehńtaj ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehńtej ...
SFX 0184 ehń ehńće ...

SFX 0185 Y 31
SFX 0185 c kli .
SFX 0185 c ku .
SFX 0185 c kł .
SFX 0185 c kła .
SFX 0185 c kłe .
SFX 0185 c kło .
SFX 0185 c kłoj .
SFX 0185 c č .
SFX 0185 c čacy .
SFX 0185 c če .
SFX 0185 c čech .
SFX 0185 c čechmoj .
SFX 0185 c čechmy .
SFX 0185 c čechu .
SFX 0185 c čemoj .
SFX 0185 c čemy .
SFX 0185 c čenje .
SFX 0185 c čeny .
SFX 0185 c četaj .
SFX 0185 c četej .
SFX 0185 c čeće .
SFX 0185 c češ .
SFX 0185 c češe .
SFX 0185 c češtaj .
SFX 0185 c češtej .
SFX 0185 c češće .
SFX 0185 c čmoj .
SFX 0185 c čmy .
SFX 0185 c čtaj .
SFX 0185 c čtej .
SFX 0185 c čće .

SFX 0186 Y 30
SFX 0186 ał aty ..
SFX 0186 ał ała ..
SFX 0186 ał ałe ..
SFX 0186 ał ało ..
SFX 0186 ał ałoj ..
SFX 0186 ał eli ..
SFX 0186 ał eć ..
SFX 0186 ał eće ..
SFX 0186 ał ni ..
SFX 0186 ał nimoj ..
SFX 0186 ał nimy ..
SFX 0186 ał nitaj ..
SFX 0186 ał nitej ..
SFX 0186 ał niće ..
SFX 0186 ał nje ..
SFX 0186 ał njech ..
SFX 0186 ał njechmoj ..
SFX 0186 ał njechmy ..
SFX 0186 ał njechu ..
SFX 0186 ał njemoj ..
SFX 0186 ał njemy ..
SFX 0186 ał njetaj ..
SFX 0186 ał njetej ..
SFX 0186 ał njeće ..
SFX 0186 ał nješ ..
SFX 0186 ał nješe ..
SFX 0186 ał nještaj ..
SFX 0186 ał nještej ..
SFX 0186 ał nješće ..
SFX 0186 ał nu ..

SFX 0187 Y 11
SFX 0187 o ata .
SFX 0187 o atach .
SFX 0187 o atam .
SFX 0187 o atami .
SFX 0187 o atow .
SFX 0187 o eća .
SFX 0187 o eći .
SFX 0187 o ećom .
SFX 0187 o ećomaj .
SFX 0187 o ećow .
SFX 0187 o eću .
