SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Burundi/0157
Cambridga/0163
Cambridge/0164
Cygan/0174
Gela/0183
Korla/0183
Michał/0159
Mongola/0183
Pawoł/0159
Roma/0165
butra/0158
buwoł/0159
byt/0160
byt/0161
bywša/0162
cebra/0165
cebu/0166
ceptar/0167
chroble/0176
coi/0170
comic/0168
compact-disc/0169
compactdisc/0169
crescenda/0171
crescenda/0172
cukini/0173
cyle/0176
cyrkej/0177
cyłkowna/0175
decrescenda/0172
djaboł/0159
dorostle/0176
doža/0183
dur/0167
dwoja/0162
dźensniša/0162
emu/0166
gnu/0166
hewaša/0162
hinaša/0162
hindu/0166
hojo/0187
hole/0180
holčo/0187
hužo/0187
hólčo/0187
imaga/0163
image/0164
jehnjo/0187
jutřiša/0162
kadla/0183
kakadu/0166
kanibala/0183
kał/0159
kenguru/0166
klětuša/0162
kmótra/0158
kopoł/0159
kreola/0183
kurjo/0187
kuša/0162
kózlo/0187
lama/0165
lehń/0184
libjo/0187
lońša/0162
lubomile/0176
lětuša/0162
maharadźa/0183
male/0180
marabu/0166
martra/0158
mile/0176
mitra/0158
mižo/0187
modle/0176
měnjatoćople/0176
młodźo/0187
nahle/0176
nakisale/0180
narańša/0162
naswětle/0176
ničeja/0162
njebole/0180
njecyle/0176
njedźelniša/0162
njelehń/0184
njepjec/0185
njeprehń/0184
njesmehń/0184
njesyc/0185
njetołc/0185
njetrjebawša/0162
njewlec/0185
njezrale/0180
njećał/0186
njećec/0185
njećehń/0184
nocturna/0163
nocturne/0164
něhduša/0162
něhdyša/0162
nětčiša/0162
něčeja/0162
padle/0176
paža/0183
pilo/0187
pjec/0185
pleńčo/0187
podwoja/0162
pomale/0180
posoł/0159
połsotra/0158
prazwěrjo/0187
prjedawša/0162
prjedyša/0162
prućo/0187
prědniša/0162
ptačo/0187
puma/0165
póndźelniša/0162
płoćo/0187
předwčerawša/0162
přemale/0180
přenahle/0176
přepomale/0180
přeswětle/0176
přezrale/0180
přećople/0176
přešle/0176
ritardanda/0172
riwala/0183
rozsahle/0176
rozžahle/0176
runjo/0187
salda/0172
skoćo/0187
slěbroběle/0180
smykle/0176
sněhběle/0180
sobjo/0187
sobotniša/0162
soboł/0159
sokolo/0187
sornjo/0187
sotra/0158
sowjo/0187
spočatna/0175
sprostle/0176
srjedowniša/0162
stajnoćople/0176
struchle/0176
stuchle/0176
swjećo/0187
swětle/0176
syc/0185
synodala/0183
sćekle/0176
tamniša/0162
tehdomniša/0162
tehdyša/0162
tołc/0185
troja/0162
truchle/0176
tudyša/0162
wandala/0183
wjelčo/0187
wjesole/0180
wlec/0185
woboja/0162
wopile/0176
wopiča/0162
wopuchle/0176
worjoł/0159
wostudle/0176
wotroča/0162
wuhlikokisale/0180
wuróh/0181
wutle/0176
wutorniša/0162
wóndańša/0162
wóslo/0187
wčerawša/0162
wšudźebył/0159
zahórkle/0176
zajutřiša/0162
zasakle/0176
zawčerawša/0162
zaćekle/0176
zašle/0176
zhnile/0176
zhromadna/0175
zle/0176
zmjerzle/0176
zrale/0180
zrěbjo/0187
zwjadle/0176
zwěrjo/0187
ćahle/0176
ćec/0185
ćehń/0184
ćelo/0187
ćichimichał/0159
ćople/0176
ćěsla/0183
Čech/0178
Čelno/0179
Čornobóh/0181
Čukča/0183
čeja/0162
čile/0176
čornoběle/0180
čornuch-njewólnik/0182
šamale/0180
šewča/0162
šibale/0180
šibał/0159
šćenjo/0187
šćěpjo/0187
šěroběle/0180
žahle/0176
žiwjo/0187
žołtoběle/0180
žrěbjo/0187
